California statutes. Water Code
 _________The Treasurer of ____ County will pay to the order of ____ out of Reclamation District No. ____ fund the sum of ____ dollars ($____) for ____ allowed by the board of trustees of said Reclamation District No. ____.Dated _____, 19__.TrusteesAttest:SecretaryReverseWhen registered this warrant bears interest at the rate of __ percent per year, computed from the date of registration hereof.This warrant will outlaw and cannot legally be paid four years after date, unless it is payable by its terms at a future date.Pay to ____ or order ____.Presented for payment but not paid for want of funds, this ____ day of ____, 19__.Treasurer of ________ County

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53021.

Demand warrants shall be presented to the county treasurer, and, if not paid on presentation, shall be registered and an endorsement of nonpayment made thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53022.

Demand warrants not paid on presentation shall bear interest from date of registration at the rate adopted by the board, pursuant to Section 53300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1109, Sec. 3.   Effective September 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

53023.

Demand warrants registered for nonpayment shall be paid by the county treasurer either in the order of registration or in the order agreed to, in writing, by all of the holders of the district’s outstanding demand warrants, if the county treasurer approves the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1109, Sec. 4.   Effective September 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Time Warrants [53040. - 53049.]

53040.

When the board has filed an operation and maintenance assessment roll in the office of the county treasurer, and has directed an assessment levied against that roll to be paid in annual installments, it may issue and sell, or otherwise dispose of, time warrants based upon, and in anticipation of, the collection of such assessment levy, to pay the expenses for the payment of which the assessment was levied on a cash basis, or for the purpose of paying any outstanding warrants payable from such assessment levy. The period over which annual installments of the assessment shall be paid shall not exceed five years or the maturity of time warrants issued pursuant to Section
 53042.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

53041.

Time warrants may be in substantially the following form: FaceNo. ________$________Office of the Board of Trustees of
 Reclamation District No. ____.______,
 CaliforniaThe Treasurer of ____ County will, on the ____ day of ____, 19__, pay to the order of ____ out of Reclamation District No. ____ maintenance fund, the sum of ____ dollars ($____), together with interest on said sum from date of registration of this warrant in the office of the county treasurer until paid at the rate of __ percent per year, the interest payable on January 1st and July 1st of each year until this warrant is paid in full, upon the presentation of this warrant to said county treasurer.This warrant is one of a series of warrants aggregating in face amount ____ dollars ($____) all issued by the above-named reclamation district, and payable out of
 the proceeds of levies made by the board of trustees of said district by order entered on the minutes of said board on the ____ day of ____, 19__, against an operation and maintenance assessment filed in the office of the treasurer of the above-named county on the ____ day of ____, 19__. This warrant and each of the warrants of said series are payable exclusively from the proceeds of said levies when collected.
Dated this ____ day of ____, 19__.TrusteesAttest:Secretary
Reverse
Registered this ____ day of ____, 19__.________ Treasurer of ____ CountyThis warrant will outlaw four years after it matures and cannot thereafter be legally paid unless extended by order of the board of trustees on or before maturity.Interest EndorsementsDate DueDate PaidAmount Paid
 Transfer Endorsements

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53042.

The time warrants which may be issued to mature in any year shall not exceed the amount of the assessment installment payable in such year, and the principal amount of time warrants which is outstanding at any time shall not exceed an amount determined by multiplying the number of acres within the district by five dollars ($5).

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53042.5.

Time warrants may be issued for more than the amount set forth in Section 53042 and with a maturity longer than five years, provided that a special election is held pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 50800) of Part 4 of this division, at which election the principal amount and maturity of such warrants and the purpose for which they are issued are approved by a majority of the votes cast.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1108.)
-------------------------------------------

53043.

No time warrants shall be issued, sold, or disposed of for less than the face amount thereof and accrued interest thereon to date of delivery.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53044.

The proceeds from the issuance and sale of time warrants shall be deposited in the maintenance fund and shall be applicable to the payment of the expenses payable from that fund, or to the payment of outstanding warrants to the same extent as funds collected upon the operation and maintenance assessment levies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53045.

Time warrants shall be registered with the county treasurer prior to their issuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53046.

Time warrants shall be paid upon their due date upon presentation and surrender to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53047.

If time warrants are not paid by reason of lack of funds, no further registration is required, and they shall continue to bear interest after their due date until paid, reissued, extended or canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53048.

Time warrants which are not paid on their due date because of lack of funds have priority and shall be paid out of the proceeds of the collection of the operation and maintenance assessment against which they have been issued, in preference to any demand warrants issued and registered after the date of regisration of such time warrants which are payable out of the same assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53049.

The county treasurer, upon the request of the board, shall pay all time warrants before the maturity thereof, providing there are sufficient funds, after payment of all outstanding demand warrants, and all such time warrants shall be presented for payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 805.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Warrants Drawn on Maintenance Fund [53070. - 53074.]

53070.

A demand warrant on the maintenance fund pursuant to Section 51546 shall designate that it is so drawn and is to be paid therefrom, and is not required to be in the form specified in Article 2 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53071.

A demand warrant drawn on the maintenance fund shall be presented to the county treasurer and, if there is insufficient money in the maintenance fund to pay it, endorsement of that fact shall be made on the warrant by the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53072.

A demand warrant unpaid for want of funds at the time of presentation shall be registered by the county treasurer separately from other warrants of the district and shall bear interest from date of registration at the rate which the board has adopted pursuant to Section 53300.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1109, Sec. 5.   Effective September 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

53073.

A demand warrant issued pursuant to this article, shall be paid only from the maintenance fund, and, when registered, either in the order of its registration or in the order agreed to, in writing, by all of the holders of the district’s outstanding demand warrants, if the county treasurer approves the agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1109, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

53074.

The provisions of Article 2 of this chapter and Article 2, Chapter 2 of this part relating to the payment or renewal of a demand warrant apply to a warrant issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Warrants Drawn on Irrigation Fund [53090. - 53093.]

53090.

A warrant drawn on the irrigation fund shall designate that it shall be paid therefrom, and is not required to be approved by the board of supervisors nor be in the form prescribed by Article 2 of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53091.

A warrant drawn on the irrigation fund shall be presented for payment to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53092.

If there is insufficient money in the irrigation fund to pay a warrant when presented, endorsement of that fact shall be made thereon by the county treasurer, who shall register it separately from other warrants of the district, and it shall thereafter bear interest from date of registration at the rate of 8 percent per year until paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

53093.

All the provisions of Article 2 of this chapter and Chapter 2, Article 2 of this part relating to the payment or renewal of warrants apply to a warrant drawn on the irrigation fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Cancellation and Reissuance [53200. - 53247.]



  ARTICLE 1. Permissive [53200. - 53202.]

53200.

The board, at the request of the holder of any warrant, may cancel it and issue two or more warrants in lieu thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53201.

If the canceled warrant has been registered each new warrant shall state that it is issued partly in lieu of a registered warrant, giving the dates of issuance and registration thereof, and upon registration of the new warrant it shall be considered as registered upon the date of registration of the canceled warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53202.

New warrants issued pursuant to this article shall be issued for the principal only of the old warrant, but, upon registration, shall bear interest from the date of registration of the canceled warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Mandatory [53220. - 53226.]

53220.

The board shall, on demand of the holder of any demand warrant outstanding one year or more, or any time warrant overdue one year of more, cancel the same and issue a new demand warrant for the face value of the old warrant, and a separate warrant for any interest then due thereon, or the board may allow a claim for the amount of any interest due on such warrant and may draw a warrant therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53221.

Warrants issued for interest pursuant to this article shall not bear interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53222.

Upon drawing an interest warrant the board shall endorse on the reverse of the old warrant the fact that interest has been paid to the date of drawing the interest warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53223.

An interest warrant shall state that it is drawn for interest on warrant No. ____ to ____ (date).

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53224.

The board shall notify the county treasurer upon drawing an interest warrant, and he shall note on his register of warrants the fact that interest has been paid on the warrant for which the interest warrant was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53225.

A demand warrant not paid or presented for reissuance within four years after its date, or a time warrant not paid within four years after its maturity may, upon the demand of the holder, be extended one or more times until repayment or reissuance, for a like period of four years from the date of each extension, upon presentation to the board, such extension being endorsed thereon by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53226.

The board and the county treasurer may cancel all warrants which have not been paid or reissued, or which have not been extended one or more times, within four years after the date of demand warrants, or within four years after the date of maturity of time warrants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Lost, Destroyed, Mutilated or Defaced Warrants [53240. - 53247.]

53240.

When the board is convinced by clear and unequivocal proof that a warrant of the district, without bad faith on the part of the holder, has been lost, destroyed, or so mutilated or defaced as to impair its value to the holder, and when such instrument is capable of being identified by number and description, the board may issue or cause to be issued a duplicate thereof having the same maturity, bearing like interest, and having the same number as the warrant proved to have been lost, destroyed, mutilated or defaced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53241.

A holder desiring to have a duplicate warrant issued shall make a written application to the board stating the facts, and shall accompany the application with a deposit of such a sum of money as is required by the board to cover the cost of preparing and issuing the duplicate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53242.

The holder of a lost or destroyed warrant shall file, with the application, a bond in double the face value of the lost or destroyed warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53243.

The bond must be approved by the board and conditioned to indemnify and save harmless the district for any claim upon the lost or destroyed warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53244.

The bond of indemnification shall be executed jointly and severally by the holder and a corporate surety approved by the board and duly authorized to do business, and doing business, in the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53245.

The holder of a mutilated or defaced warrant shall, at the time of filing the application for a duplicate, deliver the mutilated or defaced warrant to the board for cancellation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53246.

The board, upon receipt of an application for the replacement of a lost, destroyed, mutilated, or defaced warrant, shall pass a resolution stating the facts, the filing of the application, the compliance with the conditions prescribed in this article and directing the officer who supervised the preparation and issuance of the original warrant to issue or cause to be issued a duplicate thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53247.

The duplicate warrant shall be signed by the same officers and issued in all respects as nearly as possible as the original instrument, and shall have all the force, effect and validity of the original warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Miscellaneous Provisions [53300. - 53342.]



  ARTICLE 1. Interest Rate [53300. - 53300.]

53300.

The board may provide, by resolution entered in its minutes, such rate of interest upon warrants as it deems reasonable, not to exceed 12 percent per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1109, Sec. 7.   Effective September 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Calling Warrants [53320. - 53320.]

53320.

When there is sufficient money in the hands of the county treasurer applicable to the payment of any outstanding warrants which have not been presented for payment, the county treasurer may give notice by one publication in some newspaper of general circulation published in the principal county that there is money available to pay certain warrants, giving their numbers in the order of their registration, and stating that at midnight of the date of the publication the warrants mentioned shall cease to bear interest, and thereafter interest on such warrants shall cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Actions on Warrants [53340. - 53342.]

53340.

An action based upon, or connected with, a demand warrant shall be commenced within four years from the date of the warrant, and an action based upon, or connected with, a time warrant shall be commenced within four years from the date of maturity of the time warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53341.

If an action or proceeding based upon, or connected with, a demand warrant is commenced within four years after the date of the warrant, or within four years after the maturity of a time warrant, and final judgment is in favor of the holder or owner thereof, the warrant shall be paid the same as if it had been paid before the expiration of four years from the date of the warrant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53342.

In any proceeding to compel the board to issue a warrant, if a controversy arises as to the amount that is due to the plaintiff, the court shall determine the same in the manner provided for determining controversies in other civil actions, and shall cause a writ to issue for any sums found to be due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. CHANGES IN ORGANIZATION [53500. - 53805.]



  CHAPTER 1. Consolidation [53500. - 53508.]

53500.

A copy of any proposal for consolidation shall be forwarded to the State Lands Commission prior to the circulation of any petition or the adoption of any resolution making such proposal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

53504.

The State Lands Commission shall assign to the consolidated district the number of the original district containing the largest area of land, and the consolidated district shall thereafter be known by such number.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------

53508.

This chapter shall apply only to those districts formed to operate without a board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Change of Boundaries [53660. - 53660.]



  ARTICLE 3. Inclusion [53660. - 53660.]

53660.

Land in compact form, capable of being embraced in a district, and not a part of another district, may be annexed to a district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 2043.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Transfer of Districts From One County to Another [53800. - 53805.]

53800.

When a district, by a legislative act changing county boundaries, is transferred wholly from one county to another, the board of supervisors of the county to which the district is transferred, shall exercise all of the jurisdiction, power, and authority over the district theretofore exercised by the board of supervisors of the county wherein the district was originally formed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53801.

The board of supervisors of the county to which the district is transferred, the officers thereof, and the officers of the district shall thereafter perform all acts required to be performed in connection with the district with the same authority and effect as though the district had been originally organized within that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53802.

The auditor and treasurer of the county to which a district is transferred shall draw their warrant upon the treasurer of the county within which the district was previously situated for all of the funds of the district in the treasury of such county, and the funds shall be so transferred into the treasury of the county to which the district is transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53803.

After a district is transferred to another county, all assessments shall be collected and paid into the treasury of the county to which the district is transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53804.

When, by any change of county boundaries made by the Legislature of this State, any district is transferred in whole or in part to another county than the one within which it was organized, then as to such part of the district so transferred to another county, the same power and authority shall exist, and the same proceedings shall be had in the conduct and management of the district, and in the levy and collection of assessments, and in all other ways with respect to its conduct and management, as though it had been originally organized in the county where it was organized and partially in the county to which it is transferred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53805.

When a district is transferred in whole or in part to another county from that in which it was organized, all proceedings, petitions or orders which should have been recorded in the county to which the district is in whole or in part transferred shall be copied and certified by the officer having custody thereof, transferred to, and recorded in, such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. REPEALS [53900. - 53901.]

53900.

The following sections of the Political Code are repealed:344634633478344734643479344834653480344934663480a34503466a3480b34513466.63480d34523466b3480e3453346612 (As amended by3480f3454 Chapter 177 of the3480(g)3454a Statutes of
 1915)3480(h)3454b346612 (As amended by348012345412 Chapter 374 of the34813455 Statutes of 1921)34823456346734833456a346834843456a12346934853456c347034883457347134893457a34723489a3457b34733489b34583474349034593475349134603476349234613476a3493346234773493a3462a3493b

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 336.)
-------------------------------------------

53901.

The following acts are repealed:

Yr. Ch. Pg.
 1881: 59: 68
 1893:147: 174
 1895:174: 197
 1899: 16: 13
 1909:616: 933
 1913: 72: 75
 1913:365: 777
 1917:562: 781

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 337.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16. COUNTY WATERWORKS DISTRICTS [55000. - 55991.]



PART 1. INTRODUCTORY PROVISIONS [55000. - 55031.]



  CHAPTER 1. Short Title [55000. - 55000.]

55000.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the County Waterworks District Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [55010. - 55014.]

55010.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this chapter shall govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55011.

The definition of a word applies to any of its variants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55012.

“District” means any county irrigation district or county waterworks district formed pursuant to the County Waterworks District Act or any county waterworks district formed pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55013.

“Board” means the governing body of a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55014.

“County” means the county within which the district or proposed district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Applicability of Division [55030. - 55031.]

55030.

This division shall not affect any other law relating to the same or a similar subject, but is intended to provide an alternative method of procedure governing the subject to which it relates. When proceeding under the provisions of this division its provisions and none other shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55031.

The provisions of this division shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. FORMATION [55100. - 55203.]



  CHAPTER 1. Petition [55100. - 55109.]

55100.

Any portion of a county, containing unincorporated territory, or containing the whole or any portion of one or more incorporated cities and contiguous unincorporated territory, and not included in a district, may be formed into a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55101.

A district may be formed of two or more parcels of noncontiguous territory within the same county if the board of supervisors determines that the single district may be more efficiently and economically operated than if separate districts were formed, but no parcel of noncontiguous territory which contains less than 10 acres may be included in any district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

55102.

A petition for the formation of a district may be presented to the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55103.

The petition shall be presented at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors and shall be signed by not less than 25 percent of the freeholders resident within the proposed district, or by not less than 25 percent of the freeholders resident and nonresident within the proposed district, including not less than 15 percent of such resident freeholders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 148.)
-------------------------------------------

55104.

The formation petition shall contain:

(a) The name and boundaries of the proposed district to be benefited by the improvement.

(b) A general description of the improvement desired for the purpose of supplying the inhabitants of the district with water, and which may embrace any or all of the following: the acquisition, construction, installation, completion, extension, repair, or maintenance of water works, structures, and appliances, and the acquisition, by purchase, condemnation, contract, lease, or otherwise, of lands, rights-of-way, water, water rights, and water service, necessary or convenient for such purpose.

(c) An estimate of the cost of the proposed improvement and of the incidental expenses in connection therewith.

(d) A request that an election be called in the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of forming the district and the incurring of any indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district to pay the cost and expenses of the proposed improvement or any part thereof except if the petition be signed by all of the owners of property within the proposed district as such owners are shown upon the last equalized assessment roll, an election need not be requested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 839.)
-------------------------------------------

55105.

The petition shall be accompanied by a map showing the exterior boundaries of the proposed district, with relation to the territory immediately contiguous thereto, and contain a general description of the proposed improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55106.

There shall also be filed with the petition a good and sufficient undertaking, to be approved by the board of supervisors, in double the amount of the probable cost of forming the district, conditioned that the sureties shall pay the cost in case the formation of the district is not effected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55107.

The failure of the petition to contain any of the matters required to be contained therein shall not affect the legality of the organization of the district if it is thereafter organized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55108.

If the petitioners so desire, the petition may also contain a statement that the taxes provided for in this division shall be levied upon the land within the district and upon no other property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55109.

Upon the request of 25 or more freeholders, or a majority of the freeholders, if less than 50 in number, needing water service within a given area, the board of supervisors may instruct any county officer to prepare a report recommending means of providing such service, including a plan for financing, constructing, operating and maintaining facilities essential to such service and a petition for the formation of or annexation to a district, and to prepare improvement petitions, including maps, preliminary estimates, legal descriptions, and all things necessary for the completion of the petition.

The board of supervisors may instruct any qualified county officer or may engage a qualified person, firm or corporation to prepare groundwater studies and reports, plans and estimates for water systems and engineering feasibility reports for water systems, reservoirs, conduits, treatment plants, conservation and reuse of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Notice of Hearing [55130. - 55134.]

55130.

Upon the presentation of a formative petition the board of supervisors shall fix a time for hearing thereon, and protests of interested parties, not less than 21 nor more than 30 days after the date of the meeting at which the petition is presented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55131.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall cause notices of the filing and hearing of the petition to be posted in three of the most public places in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55132.

The notice shall be headed “Notice of the formation of __________ County Waterworks District No. __________” (stating name of county in which the district is located and the number of the proposed district) in letters not less than one inch in length, and shall, in legible characters, state the fact and date of the filing of the petition, the date and hour set for hearing the petition and any protests, briefly describe the proposed improvement, specify the exterior boundaries of the district to be benefited by the improvement and to be taxed to provide for the improvement, and refer to the petition, map, and general description of the proposed improvement for further particulars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55133.

The clerk shall also cause a notice, similar in substance, to be published pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county in which the proposed district is located, and designated by the board of supervisors for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

55134.

The date set for the hearing shall be at least 13 days after the date of the posting and the date of last publication of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Hearing [55150. - 55162.]

55150.

Any person interested, including any freeholder or qualified voter resident within the proposed district or the owner of any real or personal property located in the proposed district, objecting to the formation of the district, to the extent of the district, to the proposed improvement, or to the inclusion of his property in the district, may file a written protest, setting forth his objections, with the clerk of the board of supervisors at or before the time set for the hearing of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

55151.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall endorse on each protest the date of its receipt and, at the time appointed for the hearing, shall present to the board all protests filed with him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55152.

The board shall hear and pass upon the petition and protests at the time appointed, or at any time to which the hearing may be adjourned, and its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive. If protests are made to the formation of the proposed district or to the proposed improvement by any of the qualified voters of the proposed district as of the date of the petition or by the owners of any property which will be subject to taxation for district purposes if the proposed district is formed, then, notwithstanding the denial of any of such protests by the board of supervisors or the fact that the petition is signed by all of the owners of the real property within the proposed district, the board of supervisors shall, if it acquires jurisdiction pursuant to Section 55160, call an election pursuant to Section 55180.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 285.)
-------------------------------------------

55153.

If any of the protests against the formation of the district or against the proposed improvement is sustained, no further proceedings shall be had or taken pursuant to the petition, but a new petition for the same or a similar purpose may be filed at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 309.)
-------------------------------------------

55154.

If any of the protests are against the extent of the district or against the inclusion of property in the district, the board of supervisors may make such changes in the boundaries of the proposed district as it finds to be proper and advisable and shall define and establish boundaries as changed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55155.

The board of supervisors shall not modify the boundaries so as to exclude from the proposed district any territory which will be benefited by the improvement, and any territory which will not, in the judgment of the board, be benefited by the improvement shall not be included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55156.

The board of supervisors shall not modify the boundaries except after notice of such intention is published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the county and designated by the board for that purpose, describing the proposed modification, and specifying a time for hearing objections to the modification, which time shall be at least 10 days after the publication of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

55157.

Written objections to the proposed modification may be filed with the clerk of the board of supervisors by any interested person at or before the time set for hearing the objections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55158.

The board of supervisors shall hear and pass upon the objections to the proposed modification at the time appointed, or at any time to which the hearing may be adjourned, and its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55159.

If any objection is sustained, no further proceedings pursuant to the petition shall be taken, but a new petition for the same or a similar purpose may be filed at any time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55160.

The board of supervisors shall be deemed to have acquired jurisdiction to proceed further with respect to the formation of a district under any of the following circumstances:

(a) If no protests to the formation of the district are filed at or before the time set for hearing on the formation petition.

(b) If protests are filed and, after hearing, are denied.

(c) If modification of the boundaries of the district is proposed and no objections thereto are filed at or before the time set for hearing objections.

(d) If objections to the modification are filed, and after hearing, are denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

55161.

If the board of supervisors determines that the formation petition was signed by all of the owners of the real property in the proposed district and if protests are not made to the formation of the proposed district by any of the qualified voters of the proposed district as of the date of the petition or by the owners of any property which will be subject to taxation for district purposes if the proposed district is formed, and if there are no other good and sufficient protests to the formation of the district or if there is no other cause for denying the petition, then the board of supervisors may declare the district formed and direct the issuance of bonds as provided for in the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1882.)
-------------------------------------------

55162.
